Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2506.01
Electromagnetic modality, defined.

Electromagnetic modality means the use of electromagnetic waves, including radio waves, microwaves, and light waves, to transport electrical and magnetic energy through space to effect changes in body structures.

Laws 2025, LB257, § 20.